Louisiana, session 2026, HB622.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1203.4(B) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
40:1203.4(D) and (E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1203.4. Confidentiality of criminal history records
* * *
B. Except by a court order or with the written consent of the person being
investigated that directs the appropriate law enforcement agency to disseminate such
information, the criminal history records or information obtained from or regarding
the records of an employee shall not be released or otherwise disclosed to any other
person or agency.
C. The records shall be destroyed after one year from the termination of
employment of the person to whom such records relate. However, upon receipt of
written consent by an applicant for employment with a health provider, the No
employer in receipt of a criminal history check may shall send a copy to the an
employer seeking the referral of a potential applicant.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 622 ENROLLED
D. Each employer subject to this Section shall obtain a criminal history and
security check in accordance with R.S. 15:587(B) and (F), R.S. 40:1203.2, or any
other applicable provisions of law.
E. The provisions of this Section are intended to ensure compliance with
applicable state and federal laws and regulations governing criminal history record
information, including 28 CFR Part 20 and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
Criminal Justice Information Services Security Policy. Nothing in this Section shall
be construed to authorize the redissemination of criminal history record information
obtained from the Federal Bureau of Investigation. State criminal history record
information shall be maintained and disseminated in accordance with applicable state
law.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.